District of Columbia statutes.
22-1712

Repealed

Bucketing; written statement to be furnished; contents.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 869d
Mar. 1, 1909, 35 Stat. 671, ch. 233
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 3(j), 50 DCR 10996
1981 Ed., § 22-1512.
1973 Ed., § 22-1512.